North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-40.2 Use Tax
57-40.2-04.1.
Use tax exemption for food and food ingredients.

Gross receipts from sales for human consumption of food and food ingredients are exempt from taxes imposed under this chapter. Gross receipts from sales for human consumption of food and food products given, or to be given, as samples to consumers for consumption on the premises of a food store are exempt from taxes imposed by this chapter. For purposes of this section, “food” and “food ingredients” mean substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, which are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for taste or nutritional value.

For purposes of this section, “food” and “food ingredients” do not include:

Alcoholic beverages.

Candy or chewing gum.

Dietary supplements.

Prepared food.

Soft drinks containing fifty percent or less fruit juice.

Tobacco.

For purposes of this section:

“Alcoholic beverages” means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume.

“Candy” means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or flavoring in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. Candy does not include any preparation containing flour and that does not require refrigeration.

“Dietary supplement” means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet which contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: a vitamin; a mineral; an herb or other botanical; an amino acid; a dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; an oral concentrate, metabolite, constitute, extract, or combination of any dietary ingredients described in this subdivision and which is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, soft gel cap, or liquid form, or if not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of a diet; and is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the supplemental facts box found on the label and as required pursuant to 21 CFR 101.36.

“Prepared food” means:

Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item; or

Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food.

“Prepared food” does not mean:

Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller.

Eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11, of its food code so as to prevent foodborne illness.

If sold without eating utensils provided by the seller:

Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American industry classification system classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118, bakeries.

Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item.

Bakery items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, and tortillas.

Food sold that ordinarily requires additional cooking, as opposed to just reheating, by the consumer prior to consumption.

“Soft drinks” means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. “Soft drinks” does not include beverages that contain milk or milk products, soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.

“Tobacco” means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.

For purposes of this section, “eating utensils provided by the seller” is determined as follows:

Determine the prepared food ratio, where the numerator is the sum of food defined in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision d of subsection 2 plus food when plates, bowls, glasses, or cups are necessary for the purchaser to receive the food and the denominator is all sales of food and food ingredients, including prepared food, candy, dietary supplements, and soft drinks. Alcoholic beverages are not included in either the numerator or denominator.

If the prepared food ratio is seventy-five percent or less, utensils are provided by the seller if the seller’s practice is to physically give or hand them to the purchaser, except plates, bowls, glasses, or cups necessary for the purchaser to receive the food need only be made available.

If the prepared food ratio is greater than seventy-five percent, utensils are provided by the seller if they are made available to the purchaser. When sellers with a food ratio greater than seventy-five percent sell items that contain four or more servings packaged as one item and sold for a single price, the item does not become prepared food unless the seller’s practice is to physically give or hand the purchaser utensils as in subdivision b. Serving size is determined by the label of the item sold. If no label is available, the seller will reasonably determine the number of servings.

When a seller sells food items that have a utensil placed in a package by a person other than the seller and that person’s North American industry classification system classification code is that of manufacturers (sector 311), the seller shall not be considered to have provided the utensils except as in subdivisions b and c. For any other packager with any other North American industry classification system classification code, the seller shall be considered to have provided the utensil.

The prepared food ratio is to be calculated by the seller for each calendar or fiscal year not later than ninety days after the end of each year and based on the seller’s data from the previous year.

A single prepared food ratio will be determined annually and used for all of the seller’s locations in the state.

A new business shall make a good-faith estimate of the prepared food ratio for the first year and shall adjust its good-faith estimate after the first three months if the actual prepared food ratio is materially different than the estimate.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 528, § 19; 1973, ch. 465, § 6; 1981, ch. 598, § 8; 1985, ch. 639, § 2; 1987, ch. 712, § 4; 1989, ch. 718, § 4; 1989, ch. 720, § 2; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 18; 2007, ch. 528, § 23; 2009, ch. 556, § 22; 2015, ch. 459, § 6, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Food Security Act of 1985, see Pub. L. 99-198.

Food Stamp Act of 1977, see 7 USCS 2011 et seq.

57-40.2-04.2.
Use tax exemption for power plant construction, production, environmental upgrade, and repowering equipment and oil refinery or gas processing plant environmental upgrade equipment.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Environmental upgrade” means an investment greater than twenty-five million dollars or one hundred thousand dollars per megawatt of installed nameplate capacity, whichever is less, in machinery, equipment, and related facilities for reducing emissions or increasing efficiency at an existing power plant.

“Environmental upgrade” for purposes of a process unit means an investment greater than one hundred thousand dollars in machinery, equipment, and related facilities for reducing emissions, increasing efficiency, or enhancing reliability of the equipment at a new or existing process unit.

“Operator” means any person owning, holding, or leasing a power plant or process unit.

“Power plant” means:

An electrical generating plant, and all additions to the plant, which processes or converts coal in its natural form or beneficiated coal into electrical power and which has at least one single electrical energy generation unit with a capacity of fifty thousand kilowatts or more.

A wind-powered electrical generating facility, on which construction is completed before January 1, 2015, and all additions to the facility, which provides electrical power through wind generation and which has at least one single electrical energy generation unit with a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more.

Any other type of electrical power generating facility excluding the types of power plants identified in paragraphs 1 and 2 which has a capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more and produces electricity for resale or for consumption in a business activity.

“Process unit” means an oil refinery or gas processing plant and all adjacent units that are utilized in the processing of crude oil or natural gas.

“Production equipment” means machinery and attachment units, other than replacement parts, directly and exclusively used in the generation, transmission, or distribution of electrical energy for sale by a power plant.

“Repowering” means an investment of more than two hundred million dollars or one million dollars per megawatt of installed nameplate capacity, whichever is less, in an existing power plant that modifies or replaces the process used for converting coal in its natural form or beneficiated coal into electric power.

Sales of production or environmental upgrade equipment that is delivered on or after January 1, 2007, and used exclusively in power plants or repowering existing power plants or in process units are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter.

Sales of tangible personal property, other than production or environmental upgrade equipment, which is used in the construction of new power plants or to expand existing power plants or to add environmental upgrades to existing power plants or repowering existing power plants or to add environmental upgrades to existing process units are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the operator must receive from the commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property or production equipment the operator intends to purchase qualifies for the reduced rate or exemption. If a certificate is not received prior to the purchase, the operator shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property or production equipment is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the operator may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the reduced rate or exemption imposed or allowed by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 679, § 2; 2001, ch. 538, § 2; 2005, ch. 576, § 2; 2005, ch. 577, § 2; 2007, ch. 516, § 5; 2007, ch. 530, § 2; 2009, ch. 562, § 3; 2009, ch. 564, § 2; 2015, ch. 453, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

57-40.2-05.
Evidence of use.

For the purpose of the proper administration of this chapter, and to prevent evasion of the tax, evidence that tangible personal property was sold by any person for delivery in this state is prima facie evidence that such tangible personal property was sold for use in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 30.

57-40.2-06.
Payment of tax.

The tax imposed by this chapter must be paid in the following manner:

The tax upon tangible personal property which is sold by a retailer maintaining a place of business in this state, or by such other retailer as the commissioner shall authorize pursuant to subsection 2 of section 57-40.2-07, must be collected by the retailer and remitted to the commissioner as provided by section 57-40.2-07; provided, that any such retailer may not collect the tax on any purchases made by a contractor who furnishes to the retailer a certificate which includes the contractor’s license number assigned to the contractor under the provisions of chapter 43-07 and the use tax account number assigned to the contractor by the commissioner pursuant to section 43-07-04. Such certificate must be in the form prescribed by the commissioner and must be furnished by the contractor to the retailer each calendar year prior to the making of any purchases during such calendar year from the retailer without liability for paying the tax to the retailer.

The tax, when not paid in conformity with subsection 1, must be paid to the commissioner directly by any person storing, using, or consuming such property within this state, pursuant to the provisions of section 57-40.2-07.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 31; 1985, ch. 643, § 1.

Cross-References.

Direct payment of tax to commissioner authorized upon issuance of permit, see N.D.C.C. § 57-39.2-14.1.

57-40.2-07.
Collection of use tax.

The tax imposed by this chapter must be collected in the following manner:

Except as otherwise provided by section 57-39.2-14.1, every retailer maintaining a place of business in this state and making sales of tangible personal property for use in this state, not exempted under the provisions of section 57-40.2-04, before making any sales shall obtain a permit from the commissioner to collect the tax imposed by this chapter, which permit is subject to all of the requirements, conditions, and fees for its issuance that apply with respect to a retail sales tax permit, and at the time of making such sales, whether within or without the state, shall except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 of section 57-40.2-06, collect the tax imposed by this chapter from the purchaser, and give to the purchaser a receipt therefor in the manner and form prescribed by the commissioner, if the commissioner, by regulation, shall require such receipt. Each such retailer shall list with the commissioner the name and address of all of the retailer’s agents operating in this state and the location of each of the retailer’s distribution or sales houses or offices or other places of business in this state.

The commissioner, upon application, may authorize the collection of the tax imposed by this chapter by any retailer not maintaining a place of business within the state, who, to the satisfaction of the commissioner, furnishes adequate security to ensure collections and payment of the tax. To such retailer must be issued a permit to collect the tax in such manner and subject to such regulations and agreements as the commissioner shall prescribe. When so authorized, such retailer shall, except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 of section 57-40.2-06, collect the tax upon all tangible property sold to the retailer’s knowledge for use within this state, as a retailer maintaining a place of business within this state collects such tax. Such authority and permit may be canceled at any time, if the commissioner considers the security inadequate, or believes that such tax can be collected more effectively from the person using such property in this state.

The tax required to be collected, and any tax collected, by any retailer under subsections 1 and 2 constitutes a debt owed by the retailer to this state.

Except as provided in subsection 7, each retailer required or authorized, pursuant to this section, to collect such tax shall pay the tax in quarterly installments on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each quarterly period ending March thirty-first, June thirtieth, September thirtieth, and December thirty-first of each year. Except that when there is a sale of any business by any retailer required or authorized, pursuant to this section, to collect such tax or when any business is discontinued by such retailer, the tax becomes due immediately prior to the sale or discontinuance of such business and, if not paid within fifteen days thereafter, it becomes delinquent and subject to the penalties provided in section 57-40.2-15. Every retailer, at the time of making the return required by this chapter, shall compute and pay to the commissioner the tax due for the preceding period.

Except as provided in subsection 7, the retailer, on or before the last day of the month following the close of the first quarterly period as defined in subsection 4, and on or before the last day of the month following each subsequent quarterly period of three months, shall make out a return for the preceding quarterly period in such form and manner as may be prescribed by the commissioner, showing the gross receipts of the retailer, the amount of the tax for the period covered by such return, and such further information as the commissioner may require to enable the commissioner correctly to compute and collect such tax, but the commissioner, upon receipt of a proper showing by any retailer of the necessity therefor, may grant such retailer an extension of time not to exceed thirty days for making such return. If such extension is granted to any retailer, the time in which the retailer is required to make payment must be extended for the same period. If the commissioner deems it necessary or advisable in order to ensure the payment of the tax, or if the commissioner deems it practical, the commissioner may require returns and payment of the tax to be made for annual periods or other than quarterly periods, the provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding. A return must be signed by the taxpayer or the taxpayer’s duly authorized agent and must contain a written declaration that it is made and subscribed under penalties of this chapter.

Except as provided in subsection 7, any person who uses any property upon which the said tax has not been paid, either to the retailer or directly to the commissioner, is liable therefor, and, on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each quarterly period, shall pay the tax upon all such property used by that person during the preceding quarterly period, in such manner and accompanied by such returns as the commissioner shall prescribe.

If total sales and purchases subject to sales and use taxes for the preceding calendar year equal or exceed three hundred thirty-three thousand dollars, the tax levied by this chapter is payable monthly on or before the last day of the next succeeding month. The tax commissioner may, upon request and for good cause shown, waive the requirement to file and remit monthly. The amount of monthly tax payable, manner of payment, filing of the return, penalty, and waiver of penalty must be that prescribed in subsection 1 of section 57-39.2-12. Penalty and interest for failure to file a return or corrected return or to pay the tax imposed must be that prescribed in section 57-40.2-15. If a person is required to file more than one return pursuant to this section, the monthly payment requirement applies separately to each return. If total sales and purchases subject to sales and use taxes for any succeeding calendar year decrease below three hundred thirty-three thousand dollars, a person may return to quarterly installments. In the event of a business reorganization in which the ownership of the business organization remains in the same person or persons as prior to the reorganization, the total sales subject to sales and use taxes for the preceding calendar year for the business that was reorganized must be used to determine whether the tax is payable monthly under this section.

The commissioner, when in the commissioner’s judgment it is necessary and advisable to do so in order to secure the collection of such tax, may require any person subject to the tax to file with the commissioner a bond, issued by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state and approved by the insurance commissioner as to solvency and responsibility, in such amount as the commissioner may fix, to secure the payment of any tax or penalties due or which may become due from such person. In lieu of such bond, securities approved by the commissioner, in an amount which the commissioner may prescribe, may be deposited with the commissioner, and such securities must be kept in the custody of the commissioner, and may be sold by the commissioner at public or private sale, without notice to the depositor thereof, if it becomes necessary so to do in order to recover any tax or penalties due. Upon such sale, the surplus, if any remains above the amounts due, must be returned to the person who deposited the securities.

The commissioner may adopt rules for adding such tax, or the average equivalent thereof, by providing different methods applying uniformly to retailers within the same general classification for the purpose of enabling such retailers to add and collect, as far as practicable, the amount of such tax.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 32; 1969, ch. 524, § 2; 1977, ch. 547, § 2; 1983, ch. 648, § 4; 1985, ch. 640, § 2; 1991, ch. 681, § 2; 1999, ch. 520, § 3; 2011, ch. 72, § 5; 2019, ch. 477, § 16, eff for sales and use tax returns due after July 31, 2019.

Cross-References.

Contract with collection agency for collection of delinquent taxes, see N.D.C.C. § 57-01-13.

57-40.2-07.1.
Deduction to reimburse retailer for administrative expenses.

A retailer registered to report and remit sales, use, or gross receipts tax imposed under chapter 57-39.2, 57-39.5, 57-39.6, or 57-40.2 may deduct and retain one and one-half percent of the tax due. The aggregate of deductions allowed by this section and section 57-39.2-12.1 may not exceed one hundred ten dollars per return. Retailers that receive compensation under this subsection may not receive additional compensation under subsection 2 or 3 for the same period.

A certified service provider that contracts with retailers to calculate, collect, and remit tax due on behalf of retailers may deduct and retain from the tax remitted to the tax commissioner compensation or a monetary allowance up to the amount approved by the streamlined sales and use tax governing board effective June 1, 2006. The compensation provided in this subsection applies only to tax remitted by certified service providers on behalf of retailers that are remote sellers registered to collect sales and use tax in this state under chapter 57-39.4. Certified service providers that receive compensation under this subsection may not receive additional compensation under subsection 1 or 3 for the same period.

A retailer that is a remote seller registered to collect sales and use tax under chapter 57-39.4 and that uses a certified automated system to calculate, report, and remit tax due under chapters 57-39.2, 57-39.4, and 57-40.2 may deduct and retain compensation or a monetary allowance up to the amount approved by the streamlined sales and use tax governing board during its December 2006 meeting. Retailers that receive compensation under this subsection may not receive additional compensation under subsection 1 or 2 for the same period.

For purposes of this section, “remote seller” means a retailer that does not have an adequate physical presence to establish nexus in this state for sales and use tax purposes.

Compensation may not be deducted and retained under this section unless the tax due is paid within the time limitations under section 57-39.2-12 or 57-40.2-07 or chapter 57-39.4. If a retailer fails to timely file a return or pay the tax due, the tax commissioner may, for good cause shown, allow the retailer to deduct and retain the compensation under this section.

The deduction allowed retailers or certified service providers by this section is to reimburse retailers directly or indirectly for expenses incurred in keeping records, preparing and filing returns, remitting the tax, and supplying information to the tax commissioner upon request.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 648, § 5; 1987, ch. 712, § 5; 1999, ch. 520, § 4; 2005, ch. 581, § 3; 2007, ch. 532, § 2; 2011, ch. 467, § 6; 2013, ch. 464, § 2; 2015, ch. 434, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

57-40.2-08.
Unlawful advertising.

It is unlawful for any retailer to advertise or hold out or state to the public or to any purchaser, consumer, or user, directly or indirectly, that the tax or any part thereof imposed by this chapter will be assumed or absorbed by the retailer, or that it will not be added to the selling price of the property sold, or if added that it or any part thereof will be refunded.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 33; 1975, ch. 106, § 612.

57-40.2-09.
Records required.

Each retailer required or authorized to collect the tax imposed by this chapter, and each person using in this state tangible personal property purchased for resale or for use shall keep such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers as the commissioner shall require and each such retailer or person shall preserve for a period of three years and three months all invoices and other records of such tangible personal property purchased for resale or for use. The commissioner, or any duly authorized agent, may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person who sells tangible personal property or who is liable for such tax, and may investigate the character of the business of any such person to verify the accuracy of any return made, or if no return was made, to ascertain and determine the amount due. Any such books, papers, and records must be made available within this state for such examination upon reasonable notice if the commissioner shall make an order to that effect.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 34; 1967, ch. 460, § 6; 1971, ch. 573, § 3; 1985, ch. 643, § 2; 2009, ch. 65, § 7.

57-40.2-10.
Revocation of permit and authority to do business.

If any retailer maintaining a place of business in this state, or authorized to collect the tax imposed by this chapter, fails to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter, or with any order or regulation of the commissioner, the commissioner, by order, may revoke the permit, if any was issued to such retailer, or if the retailer is a corporation or limited liability company authorized to do business in this state, the commissioner may certify to the secretary of state a copy of an order finding that such retailer has failed to comply with certain specified provisions, orders, rules, or regulations. The secretary of state, upon receipt of such certified copy, may revoke the certificate authorizing such corporation or limited liability company to do business in this state, and shall issue a new certificate only when the corporation or limited liability company shall have obtained from the commissioner an order finding that the corporation or limited liability company has complied with its obligations under this chapter. Any order shall be made under this section only after a retailer has had an opportunity, upon ten days’ notice of the time, place, and purpose of a hearing, to show cause why such order should not be made. The commissioner may issue a new permit after a revocation.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 35; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

57-40.2-11.
Tax paid on articles in other states or political subdivisions of other states.

If tax has been paid on any article or tangible personal property in any other state or political subdivision thereof in respect to its sale or use in an amount less than the tax imposed by this chapter, the provisions of this chapter apply, but in an amount equal to the difference between the tax imposed by this chapter and the tax paid in the other state or political subdivision thereof. If the tax paid in the other state or political subdivision thereof is the same or more, then no tax is due on such article. The provisions of this section apply only if such other state or political subdivision thereof allows a tax credit with respect to the retail sales and use taxes imposed by this state which is substantially similar in effect to the credit allowed by this section. The tax commissioner may require the taxpayer to provide written proof from the other state or political subdivision that the tax was legally due and paid.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 36; 2015, ch. 432, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

57-40.2-12.
Unlawful sale or soliciting.

No agent, canvasser, or employee of any retailer, not authorized by permit from the commissioner, may collect the tax as prescribed by this chapter, nor sell, solicit orders for, nor deliver, any tangible personal property in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 37; 1975, ch. 106, § 613.

57-40.2-13.
Provisions of sales tax law applicable.

The provisions of chapter 57-39.2, pertaining to the administration of the retail sales tax, including provisions for refund or credit provided therein, not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter, govern the administration of the tax levied in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 38.

Collateral References.

Interest on tax refund or credit in absence of specific controlling statute, 88 A.L.R.2d 823.

57-40.2-14.
Contractor’s performance bonds for payment of use tax.

For the purposes of this section, the term “contractor” includes any person or group or combination of persons acting as a unit; “subcontractor” includes a person or group or combination of persons acting as a unit, who undertakes to perform all or any part of work covered by the original contract entered into by the contractor, including the furnishing of any supplies, materials, equipment, or any other tangible personal property; “surety” means a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state; and “surety company” means any person executing the surety.

Whenever any contractor or subcontractor enters into any contract for the erection of buildings or the alteration, improvement, or repair of real property in this state and the contractor or subcontractor furnishes surety for the faithful performance of such contract, there is hereby imposed the additional obligation upon the surety company to the state of North Dakota that said contractor or subcontractor shall promptly pay all use taxes which may accrue to the state of North Dakota under this chapter. In the case of a contractor and the contractor’s surety company, this additional obligation shall include liability to pay to the commissioner on purchases made by either the contractor or the subcontractor all such use taxes which have not been paid to a retailer authorized or required to collect such taxes; and the contractor or the contractor’s surety company may recover from the subcontractor the amount of any use taxes accruing with respect to purchases made by the subcontractor which the contractor or the surety company may be required to pay to the commissioner, or to withhold from the amount due the subcontractor under the subcontract an amount equal to any use taxes accruing with respect to purchases of the subcontractor which have not been paid by the subcontractor to the commissioner or to a retailer authorized or required to collect such taxes. Such liability on the part of the surety company is limited to three percent of the amount of the contract price.

The surety company within sixty days after executing such surety shall send written notice of the same to the commissioner, which notice must give the names and addresses of the parties contracting with respect to the real property and the place where the contract is to be performed. After the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the improvement by the owner of the real property improved, the surety company shall give written notice of such completion and acceptance to the commissioner.

Six months after the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the improvement by the owner thereof, the additional obligation imposed upon the surety company ceases unless written notice, within such period of time, of unpaid use taxes, is given to the surety company by the commissioner.

This section does not modify or repeal any provision of chapter 48-01.2.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 39; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 443, § 22; 2007, ch. 403, § 16.

57-40.2-15.
Penalties — Offenses.

Any person failing to file a return or corrected return or to pay any tax imposed under this chapter, within the time required by this chapter, is subject to interest of one percent of the tax for each month or fraction of a month except the first month after the return or the tax became due.

In addition to the tax and interest prescribed in this chapter, a taxpayer is subject to penalties as follows:

If any taxpayer, without intent to evade any tax imposed by this chapter, fails to file a return, on or before the prescribed or extended due date, a penalty equal to five percent of the tax required to be reported, or five dollars, whichever is greater, must be added if the failure is for not more than one month, counting each fraction of a month as an entire month, with an additional five percent for each additional month or fraction of a month during which the failure continues, not exceeding twenty-five percent in the aggregate.

If any taxpayer, without intent to evade any tax imposed by this chapter, fails to pay the amount shown as tax due on any return, filed on or before the prescribed or extended due date, a penalty of five percent of the tax due, or five dollars, whichever is greater, must be added to the tax.

If upon audit of a taxpayer’s return an additional tax is found to be due, penalty as prescribed in subdivision a or b must be added to the tax.

The commissioner, if satisfied that the delay was excusable, may waive, and if paid, refund all or any part of the penalty and interest. The penalty and interest must be paid to the commissioner and disposed of in the same manner as the tax with respect to which it is attached. Unpaid penalties and interest may be enforced in the same manner as is the tax.

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

The certificate of the commissioner to the effect that a tax has not been paid, that a return has not been filed, or that information has not been supplied pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is prima facie evidence thereof.

Any person failing to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter, or failing to remit within the time herein provided to the state the tax due on any sale or purchase of tangible personal property subject to the tax imposed under the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 40; 1969, ch. 526, § 2; 1975, ch. 106, §§ 614, 673; 1979, ch. 611, § 4; 1989, ch. 721, § 2; 2001, ch. 530, § 3.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

57-40.2-15.1.
Corporate officer liability.

If a corporation fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due under this chapter, the president, vice president, secretary, or treasurer of the corporation, jointly or severally, having control or supervision of, or charged with the responsibility for making the returns and payments are personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a corporation does not discharge an officer’s liability for a prior failure of the corporation to make a return or remit the tax due. The sum due for the liability may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the assessment and collection of other liabilities.

If the corporate officers, governors, managers, or members of a member-controlled limited liability company elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the corporation or limited liability company must be required to make a cash deposit or post with the tax commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking provided for in this section must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual use tax liability of the corporation or limited liability company.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 548, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1999, ch. 509, § 7; 1999, ch. 522, § 3; 2001, ch. 521, § 4.

57-40.2-15.2.
Governor and manager liability.

If a limited liability company fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the taxes due under this chapter, the governor, manager, or member of a member-controlled limited liability company, jointly or severally charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payments, is personally liable for the failure. The dissolution of a limited liability company does not discharge a governor’s, manager’s, or member’s liability for a prior failure of the limited liability company to file a return or remit the tax due. The sum due for such a liability may be assessed and collected under the provisions of this chapter.

If the governors, managers, or members of a limited liability company elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability company must make a cash deposit or post with the commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual use tax liability of the limited liability company.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 522, § 4; 2001, ch. 521, § 5; 2013, ch. 443, § 34.

57-40.2-15.3.
Liability of a general partner in a limited liability limited partnership.

If a limited liability limited partnership required to hold a permit under this chapter fails for any reason to file the required returns or to pay the tax due under this chapter, the general partners, jointly or severally, charged with the responsibility of supervising the preparation of the returns and payment of the tax are personally liable for the partnership’s failure. The dissolution of a limited liability limited partnership does not discharge a general partner’s liability for a prior failure of the partnership to file a return or remit the tax due. The taxes, penalty, and interest may be assessed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

If the general partners elect not to be personally liable for the failure to file the required returns or to pay the tax due, the limited liability limited partnership must make a cash deposit or post with the commissioner a bond or undertaking executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The cash deposit, bond, or undertaking must be in an amount equal to the estimated annual use tax liability of the limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 443, § 35.